Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3010
Civil Legal Services Fund; how funded.

Beginning January 1, 2007, a fee of one dollar shall be taxed as costs in each criminal proceeding, including traffic infractions and misdemeanors, filed in all courts of this state for violations of state law or city or village ordinances. No such fee shall be collected in any juvenile court proceeding or when waived under section 29-2709. Such fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the close of each calendar quarter. The State Treasurer shall credit the money to the Civil Legal Services Fund.

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 6.